public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX n0 ar ensi ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ar isen ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ar isene ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ar isense ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ar isensi ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 er on er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er one er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er onse er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er ion [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er ione [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er ionse [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er ison er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er isone er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er isonse er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er ision er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er isione er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 er isionse er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r n er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r ne er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r nse er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r nsi er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 er isen er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 er isene er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 er isense er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 er isensi er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 erò on erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò one erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò onse erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò ion [^cijɉñ]erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò ione [^cijɉñ]erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò ionse [^cijɉñ]erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò ison erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isone erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isonse erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò ision erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isione erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isionse erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 rò n erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 rò ne erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 rò nse erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 rò nsi erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isen erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isene erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isense erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 erò isensi erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ir on ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 ir one ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 ir onse ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r on [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r one [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r onse [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r son ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r sone ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r sonse ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r sion ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r sione ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 r sionse ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)(i)ón(e/se)
SFX n0 ir en ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ir ene ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r ne ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ir ense ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ir ensi ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r sen ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r sene ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r sense ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 r sensi ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T11 + (is)én(e/se)
SFX n0 ar ié [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar iede [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar iege [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar iè [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar iède [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar iège [^cijɉñ]ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isié/J4I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isiede ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isiege ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isiè/J4I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isiède ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar isiège ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esié/J4I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esiede ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esiege ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esiè/J4I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esiède ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar esiège ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (es)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 er ié [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er iede [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er iege [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er iè [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 er iède [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 er iège [^cijɉñ]er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
SFX n0 er isié/J4I4 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er isiede er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er isiege er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX n0 er isiè/J4I4 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)iè([dg]e)
