public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
arđerar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
balar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql-1+0^1*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
barxeletar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inbestialir/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
boɉerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1.0*0	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:bóɉer
dexbotiliar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
bruniso/n0T8N8tClC7CJ1I1FS+0	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:brunir
scevedir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
dixnar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:de
đemear/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
đugolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0QlVp	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
torefar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xFxGxH	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:tore
trafegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:tra
fidusiar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
infoñar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
frixerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1-1.0*0	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:fríxer
ingamelar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
ingoloxiso/n0T8N8tClCJ1I1FS	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:ingoloxir dp:in
grenbialar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
guañar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
injarmar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7Vp	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
inkaliso/n0T8N8tClCJ1I1FS	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:inkalir dp:in
kapiso/n0T8N8tClC7CJ1I1FS^6	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:kapir
inkatorigolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kolgar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inkoraɉir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
krikolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skular/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
xlaŧar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
liđieriso/n0T8N8tClCJ1I1FS+0*0	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:liđierir
lunariar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
mañasar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
maxnar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
perminir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:pre
mostrar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-0-1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
en-nïar/t0l070n0t2P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
ofisiar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ob
padir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
konpariso/n0T8N8tClC7CJ1I1FS-1.0*0	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:konparir dp:kon
skonpaxenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon dp:s
pestiso/n0t8n8tAlA7AJ1FS	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:pestisar
pilukar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
pomegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
premiar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ranbar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rinŧiñar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rugolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
desaviso/n0T8N8tClC7CJ1I1FS	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:desavir dp:de
señalar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skandaɉar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
sojar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
spedar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
stanpelar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
strisonar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
arsusitar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re dp:ad
intemerar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
tramacar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inseñar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
süetar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xverdelar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
vovar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
